Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Chief Medical Examiner and Postmortem Examinations.
§ 32.1-283.8.
Maternal Mortality Review Team; duties; membership; confidentiality; penalties; report; etc.

As used in this section, “maternal death” means the death of a woman who was pregnant at the time of death or within one year prior to the time of death, regardless of the outcome of the pregnancy, including any death determined to be a natural death, unnatural death, or violent death or for which no cause of death was determined.

There is hereby created the Maternal Mortality Review Team (the Team), which shall develop and implement procedures to ensure that certain maternal deaths occurring in the Commonwealth are analyzed in a systematic way. The Team shall review every maternal death in the Commonwealth. The Team shall not initiate a maternal death review until the conclusion of any law-enforcement investigation or criminal prosecution. The Team shall (i) develop and revise as necessary operating procedures for maternal death reviews, including identification of cases to be reviewed and procedures for coordinating among the agencies and professionals involved; (ii) improve the identification of and data collection and record keeping related to causes of maternal deaths; (iii) recommend components of programs to increase awareness and prevention of and education about maternal deaths; and (iv) recommend training to improve the review of maternal deaths. Such operating procedures shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision B 17 of §

2.2-4002

.

The Team shall consist of the following persons or their designees: the Chief Medical Examiner, the Director of the Office of Family Health of the Department of Health, the State Registrar of Vital Records, and the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. In addition, the Governor shall appoint one representative of each of the following entities: local law enforcement, local fire departments, local emergency medical services providers, local departments of social services, community services boards, attorneys for the Commonwealth, the Medical Society of Virginia, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Section of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the Virginia Affiliate of the American College of Nurse-Midwives, the Virginia Chapter of the Association of Women’s Health, Obstetric and Neonatal Nurses, the Virginia Neonatal Perinatal Collaborative, the Virginia Midwives Alliance, and the Virginia Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics. The Chief Medical Examiner and the Director of the Office of Family Health of the Department of Health shall serve as co-chairs of the Team and may appoint additional members of the Team as may be needed to complete maternal death reviews pursuant to this section.After the initial staggering of terms, members other than the Chief Medical Examiner, the Director of the Office of Family Health of the Department of Health, the State Registrar of Vital Records, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall be appointed for a term of three years. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed. The Chief Medical Examiner, the Director of the Office of Family Health of the Department of Health, the State Registrar of Vital Records, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

Upon the request of the Chief Medical Examiner in his capacity as a co-chair of the Team, made after the conclusion of any law-enforcement investigation or prosecution, the Chief Medical Examiner or his designee may inspect and copy information and records regarding a maternal death, including (i) any report of the circumstances of the maternal death maintained by any state or local law-enforcement agency or medical examiner, and (ii) information or records about the woman maintained by any social services agency or court. Information, records, or reports maintained by any attorney for the Commonwealth shall be made available for inspection and copying by the Chief Medical Examiner or his designee pursuant to procedures that shall be developed by the Chief Medical Examiner and the Commonwealth’s Attorneys’ Services Council established by §

2.2-2617

. Any presentence report prepared pursuant to §

19.2-299

for any person convicted of a crime that led to the death of the woman shall be made available for inspection and copying by the Chief Medical Examiner or his designee. In addition, the Chief Medical Examiner or his designee may inspect and copy from any health care provider in the Commonwealth, on behalf of the Team, (a) without obtaining consent, subject to any limitations on disclosure under applicable federal and state law, the health and mental health records of the woman and those prenatal medical records relating to any child born to the woman and (b) upon obtaining consent, from each adult regarding his records.

All information and records obtained or created by the Team or on behalf of the Team regarding a review shall be confidential and excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. All such information and records shall be used by the Team only in the exercise of its proper purpose and function and shall not be disclosed. In preparing information and records for review by the Team, the Department shall remove any individually identifiable information or information identifying a health care provider, as those terms are defined in 45 C.F.R. § 160.103. Such information shall not be subject to subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, or discovery, be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding, or be used as evidence in any disciplinary proceeding or regulatory or licensure action of the Department of Health Professions or any health regulatory board. If available from other sources, however, such information and records shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the Team during a maternal death review. The findings of the Team may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form, but shall not identify any individual. Upon conclusion of the maternal death review, all information and records concerning the woman and the woman’s family shall be shredded or otherwise destroyed by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner in order to ensure confidentiality.The portions of meetings in which individual maternal deaths are discussed by the Team shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. In addition to the requirements of §

2.2-3712

, all Team members and other persons attending closed Team meetings, including any persons presenting information or records on specific maternal deaths to the Team during closed meetings, shall execute a sworn statement to (i) honor the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during meetings at which the Team reviews a specific maternal death and (ii) not use any such information, records, discussions, or opinions disclosed during meetings at which the Team reviews a specific maternal death for any purpose other than the exercise of the proper purpose and function of the Team. Violations of this subsection are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Upon notification of a maternal death, any state or local government agency maintaining records on the woman or the woman’s family that are periodically purged shall retain such records for the longer of 12 months or until such time as the Team has completed its review of the case.

The Team shall compile triennial statistical data, which shall be made available to the Governor and the General Assembly. Any statistical compilations prepared by the Team shall be public record and shall not contain any personal identifying information.

Members of the Team, as well as their agents and employees, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission made in connection with participation in a review by the Team, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. Any organization, institution, or person furnishing information, data, testimony, reports, or records to the Team as part of such review shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission in furnishing such information, unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

2019, c. 834.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 834, cl. 2 provides: “That the initial appointments of members of the Maternal Mortality Review Team other than the Chief Medical Examiner, the Director of the Office of Family Health of the Department of Health, the State Registrar of Vital Records, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services, who shall serve terms coincident with their respective terms in office, shall be staggered as follows: five members shall be appointed for a term of one year, five members shall be appointed for a term of two years, and five members shall be appointed for a term of three years.”

§ 32.1-284.
Repealed by acts 2014, c. 228, cl. 2, effective March 7, 2014.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to cremations and burials at sea, see §

32.1-309.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 583, also amended this section. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment by c. 583 has been given effect in §

32.1-309.3

.

Former
§

32.1-284

, pertaining to cremations and burials at sea, derived from 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-285.
Autopsies.

If, in the opinion of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, it is advisable and in the public interest that an autopsy be made as part of the investigation of the death, or if an autopsy is requested by the attorney for the Commonwealth or by a judge of the circuit court of the county or city wherein such body is or where death occurred or wherein any injury contributing to or causing death was sustained, an autopsy shall be performed by the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a pathologist with whom the Commissioner has entered into an agreement in accordance with §

32.1-281

. Upon petition of a member of the immediate family or the spouse of the deceased in a case of death by injury, such circuit court may, for good cause shown, order an autopsy, after providing notice and an opportunity to be heard to the attorney for the Commonwealth for the jurisdiction wherein the injury contributing to or causing death was sustained or where death occurred. Further, in all cases of death suspected to be attributable to Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS), an autopsy shall be advisable and in the public interest and shall be performed as required by §

32.1-285.1

. A full record and report of the facts developed by the autopsy and findings of the person making such autopsy shall be promptly made and filed with the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and a copy furnished the judge or attorney for the Commonwealth requesting such autopsy. In the discretion of the Chief Medical Examiner or an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, a copy of any autopsy report or findings may be furnished to any appropriate attorney for the Commonwealth and to the appropriate law-enforcement agency investigating the death.

In the case of a child death investigation that indicates child abuse or neglect contributed to the death, or that the child suffered from abuse and neglect, the case shall be immediately reported to the child protective services unit of the local Department of Social Services by the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.19; 1952, c. 318; 1960, c. 366; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 66; 1991, c. 644; 1993, c. 965; 2003, c. 368; 2014, c. 583.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 368 added “and to the appropriate law-enforcement agency investigating the death” at the end of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 rewrote the section.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration.

§ 32.1-285.1.
Death of infants under eighteen months of age; autopsies required; definition of Sudden Infant Death Syndrome.

An autopsy shall be performed in the case of any infant death which is suspected to be attributable to Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS).

For the purposes of this section,
“Sudden Infant Death Syndrome”
(SIDS), a diagnosis of exclusion, means the sudden and unexpected death of an infant less than eighteen months of age whose death remains unexplained after a thorough postmortem examination which includes an autopsy.

History.

1993, c. 965.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Cause of death. —

Felony homicide resulting from felony child neglect indictment under §

18.2-33

was dismissed as the victim died from Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS), and under §

32.1-285.1

, a death caused by SIDS resulted from an unexplained cause; the Commonwealth could not prove that defendant’s or her employees’ acts or omissions caused the victim’s death, even if defendant’s or her employees’ acts or omissions exposed the victim to SIDS risk factors. Commonwealth v. Futrell, 83 Va. Cir. 389, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 48 (Norfolk Jan. 3, 2012).

§ 32.1-286.
Exhumations.

In any case of death described in subsection A of §

32.1-283

, where the body is buried without investigation by the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

into the cause and manner of death or where sufficient cause develops for further investigation after a body is buried, the Chief Medical Examiner shall authorize such investigation and shall send a copy of the report, which shall include the name and contact information of the next of kin, as defined in § 54.1-2800, of the dead person, if known, to the appropriate attorney for the Commonwealth who shall communicate such report to a judge of the appropriate circuit court and forward a copy of such report to the clerk of such court. In cases in which the name and contact information of the next of kin is not known at the time the report is prepared, the Chief Medical Examiner shall so indicate on the report. Upon receipt of such report, the clerk of the court shall send notice of the investigation and any order of exhumation to the next of kin of the dead person when the name and contact information of the next of kin is included in the report. The judge may order that the body be exhumed and an autopsy performed thereon by the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a pathologist with whom the Commissioner has entered into an agreement pursuant to §

32.1-281

. The pertinent facts disclosed by an autopsy conducted pursuant to an order entered in accordance with this subsection shall be communicated to the judge who ordered the autopsy.

Upon petition of the attorney for the Commonwealth to whom a report is submitted in accordance with subsection A and a finding that good cause exists, a judge for the appropriate circuit court may, for a period of time not to exceed ninety days, order that (i) notification of the next of kin of the dead person be withheld, (ii) the report and order for exhumation be sealed by the clerk of the circuit court, and (iii) any parties involved in the investigation or exhumation not disclose to the next of kin of the dead person or any other person that the court may deem appropriate that the investigation or exhumation has occurred. Upon the petition of the attorney for the Commonwealth and a finding that good cause exists, the court may extend any such time period for additional periods not to exceed ninety days for each extension granted.

In any case of death in which a private person has an interest, such person may petition the judge of the circuit court exercising jurisdiction over the place of interment to have the body exhumed. Such petition shall include the name and contact information of the next of kin of the dead person or, in cases in which the name and contact information is not known, an affirmation that good faith efforts to determine the name and contact information have been made. Upon receipt of the petition, the clerk of the court shall send notice of the petition to the next of kin of the dead person when the name and contact information of the next of kin is included in the petition. Upon proper showing of sufficient cause, such judge may order the body exhumed. Such petition or exhumation or both shall not require the participation of the Chief Medical Examiner or any Assistant Chief Medical Examiner. Costs shall be paid by the party requesting the exhumation.

A party attempting to prove, in accordance with the provisions of §§

64.2-102

and

64.2-103

, that he is the issue of a dead person, may petition the judge of the circuit court exercising jurisdiction over the place of interment to have the body exhumed. The petition shall be accompanied by the petitioner’s sworn statement that sets forth facts establishing a reasonable possibility of a biological relationship between the petitioner and his alleged ancestors, and shall include the name and contact information of the next of kin of the dead person or, in cases in which the name and contact information is not known, an affirmation that good faith efforts to determine the name and contact information have been made. Upon receipt of the petition, the clerk of the court shall send notice of the petition to the next of kin of the dead person when the name and contact information of the next of kin is included in the petition. The court may order the exhumation of the dead person for the conduct of scientifically reliable genetic tests, including DNA tests, to prove a biological relationship. The costs of exhumation, testing, and reinterment shall be paid by the petitioner unless, for good cause shown, the court orders such costs paid from the estate in which the petitioner is claiming an interest. This provision is intended to provide a procedural mechanism for obtaining posthumous samples for reliable genetic testing and shall not require substantive proof of parentage to obtain the exhumation order.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31.19; 1952, c. 318; 1960, c. 366; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 1997, c. 59; 1999, c. 781; 2013, c. 370; 2014, c. 583; 2016, c. 356.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “64.1-5.1 and 64.1-5.2” was changed to “64.2-102 and

64.2-103

” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

Acts 1997, c. 59, pursuant to the legislative summary, was intended to overrule the Virginia Supreme Court decision in
Garrett v. Majied
, 471 S.E.2d 479,

252 Va. 46

(1996).

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 370, in subsection C, substituted “dead person” for “person dead and buried,” and “any dead” for “a dead” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “in which the petitioner is claiming an interest” for “of the exhumed deceased” in the present third sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsection A, inserted “the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or” in the first sentence and inserted “or a pathologist with whom the Commissioner has entered into an agreement pursuant to §

32.1-281

” in the second sentence and substituted “appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

into” for “as to”; and in subsection B, substituted “or any” for “or his” and “Examiner” for “Examiners.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 356 rewrote section.

Law Review.

For an article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1249 (1997).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5C M.J. Dead Bodies, § 5; 7B M.J. Evidence, §§ 84, 221; 9B M.J. Homicide, §§ 59, 76.

§ 32.1-287.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§§ 32.1-288,
32.1-288.1.

Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 228, cl. 2, effective March 7, 2014.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to disposition of unclaimed dead body; how expenses paid, see §

32.1-309.2

. For current provisions as to determination of hazardous human remains, see §

32.1-309.4

.

Editor’s note.

Former
§

32.1-288

, pertaining to disposition of dead body; how expenses paid derived from Code 1950, § 32-31.21; 1960, c. 366; 1968, c. 713; 1975, c. 475; 1979, c. 711; 1992, c. 128; 1995, c. 532; 2005, c. 905; 2011, cc. 567, 569; 2013, c. 373.

Former § 32.1-288.1, pertaining to determination of hazardous human remains, derived from 2006, c. 651.